src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/A-havvske_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Adjektiv - hávvske: # A_AALLKE

    hávvske+A+Attr: hávvskes

    hávvske+A+Sg+Nom: hávvske
    hávvske+A+Pl+Nom: hávvske

#    hávvske+A+Sg+Gen: hávvske
#    hávvske+A+Sg+Acc: hávvskev
#    hávvske+A+Sg+Ill: hávvskáj
#    hávvske+A+Sg+Ine: hávvsken
#    hávvske+A+Sg+Ela: hávvskest
#    hávvske+A+Sg+Com: hávskijn
#    hávvske+A+Pl+Gen: hávskij
#    hávvske+A+Pl+Acc: hávskijt
#    hávvske+A+Pl+Ill: hávskijda
#    hávvske+A+Pl+Ine: hávskijn
#    hávvske+A+Pl+Ela: hávskijst
#    hávvske+A+Pl+Com: hávskij
#    hávvske+A+Ess: hávvsken

    hávvske+A+Comp+Attr: hávvskep

    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: hávvskep
    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: hávvskeba

#    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: hávvskebu
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: hávvskebuv
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: hávvskebuj
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: hávvskebun
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: hávvskebust
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Sg+Com: hávvskebujn
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: hávvskebuj
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: hávvskebujt
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: hávvskebujda
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: hávvskebujn
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: hávvskebujst
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Pl+Com: hávvskebuj
#    hávvske+A+Comp+Ess: hávvskebun

    hávvske+A+Superl+Attr: hávvskemus

    hávvske+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: hávvskemus
    hávvske+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: hávvskemusa
